Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6339.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "electric bicycle safety act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Electric bicycle" means that term as defined in section 13e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.13e. (b) "Electric bicycle battery" means a battery pack that is used to power the electric motor of an electric bicycle. (c) "Electrical system" means the entire electrical system of an electric bike, including, but not limited to, the electric bicycle battery, electric motor, and charger. Sec. 5. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a person shall not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise distribute an electric bicycle battery unless the electric bicycle battery has been certified to UL 2271 safety standards. (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, an electric bicycle that is manufactured, sold, offered for sale, or otherwise distributed must be equipped with both of the following: (a) An electric bicycle battery that has been certified to UL 2271 safety standards. (b) An electrical system that has been certified to UL 2849 safety standards. (3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, an individual shall not operate an electric bicycle unless the electric bicycle is equipped with both of the following: (a) An electric bicycle battery that has been certified to UL 2271 safety standards. (b) An electrical system that has been certified to UL 2849 safety standards. Sec. 7. (1) A person that violates section 5(1) or (2) is subject to the following, as applicable: (a) For a first violation, the person is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. (b) For a second violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (c) For a third or subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who violates section 5(3) is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $500.00.